Mississippi statutes. Title 29. Public Lands, Buildings and Property
In General

§ 29-5-1.
Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter, the term “Office of General Services” shall mean the Governor’s office of general services acting through the bureau of capitol facilities.

For purposes of this chapter, “director” shall mean the director of the bureau of capitol facilities of the office of general services.

Wherever the term “capitol commission” appears in the laws of the State of Mississippi, it shall be construed to mean the bureau of capitol facilities of the office of general services.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 4657; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3930; 1930, § 4009; 1942, § 8952; Laws, 1904, ch. 109; Laws, 1932, ch. 125; Laws, 1962, ch. 506, § 1, and ch. 588, § 20; Laws, 1964, ch. 571, §§ 1-6; Laws, 1964 1st Sess ch. 21; Laws, 1966, ch. 544, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 553, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 29-5-2.
Responsibilities and duties.

The duties of the Department of Finance and Administration shall be as follows:

(i) To exercise general supervision and care over and keep in good condition the following state property located in the City of Jackson: the New State Capitol Building, the Woolfolk State Office Building and Parking Garage, the Carroll Gartin Justice Building, the Walter Sillers Office Building and Parking Garage, the War Veterans’ Memorial Building, the Charlotte Capers Building, the William F. Winter Archives and History Building, the Mississippi Museum Complex, the Gulf, Mobile and Ohio Train Depot (GM&O Depot), the Old State Capitol Building, the Governor’s Mansion, the Heber Ladner Building, the Robert E. Lee Office Building, the Robert E. Lee Parking Garage, the former Naval Reserve Center, 515 East Amite Street, 620 North Street, 660 North Street, 700 North State Street, the State Records Center, the Robert G. Clark, Jr. Building, the Mississippi State Fairgrounds Complex, the Robert E. Lee Office Building and Parking Garage, the former Central High Building, as well as all state-owned or leased buildings situated on seat of government property.

To exercise general supervision and care over and keep in good condition the Dr. Eldon Langston Bolton Building located in Biloxi, Mississippi.

To exercise general supervision and care over and keep in good condition the State Service Center, located at the intersection of U.S. Highway 49 and John Merl Tatum Industrial Drive in Hattiesburg, Mississippi.

To exercise general supervision and care over and keep in good condition any property purchased, constructed or otherwise acquired by the State of Mississippi for conducting state business and not specifically under the supervision and care by any other state entity, but which is reasonably assumed the department would be responsible for such, as approved by the Public Procurement Review Board, including, but not limited to:

1. The National Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA) Shared Services Center and Lockheed Martin Building at Stennis Space Center;

2. The Mississippi Sports Hall of Fame;

3. The Mississippi Crafts Center;

4. The Mississippi Children’s Museum; and

5. The Mississippi Arts and Entertainment Center.

To assign suitable office space for the various state departments, officers and employees who are provided with an office in any of the buildings under the jurisdiction or control of the Department of Finance and Administration. However, the assignment of space in the New Capitol Building shall be designated by duly passed resolution of the combined Senate Rules Committee and the House Management Committee, meeting as a joint committee, approved by the Lieutenant Governor and Speaker of the House of Representatives. A majority vote of the members of the Senate Rules Committee and a majority vote of the members of the House Management Committee shall be required on all actions taken, resolutions or reports adopted, and all other matters considered by the full combined committee on occasions when the Senate Rules Committee and the House Management Committee shall meet as a full combined committee.

To approve or disapprove with the concurrence of the Public Procurement Review Board, any lease or rental agreements by any state agency or department, including any state agency financed entirely by federal and special funds, for space outside the buildings under the jurisdiction of the Department of Finance and Administration, including space necessary for parking to be used by state employees who work in the Woolfolk Building, the Carroll Gartin Justice Building or the Walter Sillers Office Building. In no event shall any employee, officer, department, federally funded agency or bureau of the state be authorized to enter into a lease or rental agreement without prior approval of the Department of Finance and Administration and the Public Procurement Review Board.

The Department of Finance and Administration is authorized to use architects, engineers, building inspectors and other personnel for the purpose of making inspections as may be deemed necessary in carrying out its duties and maintaining the facilities.

To acquire by lease, lease-purchase agreement, or otherwise, as provided in Section 27-104-107, and to assign through the Office of General Services, by lease or sublease agreement from the office, and with the concurrence of the Public Procurement Review Board, to any state agency or department, including any state agency financed entirely by federal and special funds, appropriate office space in the buildings acquired.

[Repealed]

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 8952-01, 8952-02; Laws, 1972, ch. 326, §§ 2, 3; Laws, 1979, ch. 440; Laws, 1980, ch. 375, § 2; Laws, 1981, ch. 424, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 402, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 8; Laws, 1986, ch. 500, § 13; Laws, 1993, ch. 311, § 2; Laws, 1996, ch. 398, § 3; Laws, 1998, ch. 424, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 325, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 301, § 3; Laws, 2005, ch. 504, § 3; Laws, 2006, ch. 457, § 2; Laws, 2008, ch. 430, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 542, § 2; Laws, 2010, ch. 314, § 2; Laws, 2013, ch. 357, § 2; Laws, 2014, ch. 533, § 2; Laws, 2017, ch. 330, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 13, 2017).

§ 29-5-3.
Use of rooms and apartments of New Capitol.

The several rooms and apartments of the New Capitol shall not be occupied by any other persons nor for any other purpose than as expressly authorized by the legislature; provided, however, that it shall be the duty of the legislature to provide office space in the New Capitol for any state department, officer or employee where it is provided by law that such department, officer or employee shall have an office in the state capitol.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 278; 1892, § 4107; 1906, §§ 4657, 4659; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 3930, 7495; 1930, §§ 4008, 4009; 1942, §§ 8951, 8952; Laws, 1904, ch. 109; Laws, 1932, ch. 125; Laws, 1962, ch. 506, § 1 and ch. 588, § 20; Laws, 1964, ch. 571, §§ 1-6; Laws, 1964 1st Sess ch. 21; Laws, 1966, ch. 544, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 553, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 326, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 402, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 29-5-5.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1980, ch. 560, § 32, eff from and after May 26, 1980.

§29-5-5. [Codes, 1906, § 4657; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3930; 1930, § 4009; 1942, § 8952; Laws, 1904, ch. 109; Laws, 1932, ch. 125; Laws, 1962, ch. 506, § 1; Laws, 1962, ch. 588, § 20; Laws, 1964, ch. 571, §§ 1-6; Laws, 1964, 1st Sess, ch. 21; Laws, 1966, ch. 544, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 553, § 1]

§ 29-5-6.
Commission expenses.

All monies expended by the Bureau of Capitol Facilities shall be drawn out of the State Treasury only upon the warrant of the Department of Finance and Administration, which shall issue the same only where a specific itemized account shall have been rendered it, which account shall be approved in writing by the Director of the Bureau of Capitol Facilities.

Any department, agency or political subdivision of the government of the state, or any organization occupying offices in any of the office buildings under the jurisdiction or control of the Office of General Services shall pay as directed by the office into the fund created in Section 27-104-107(7), a rent to be fixed by the office which shall conform to prevailing commercial rents in the general area. The Veterans Affairs Board shall pay rent for veterans organizations and veterans auxiliary organizations presently using space in the property described, set apart, and exclusively dedicated as a perpetual memorial to the veterans of World War I, 1914-1918, by Chapter 297, Laws of 1934, if it becomes necessary for such rent to be paid.

In the event that the sums are not paid as directed by the Office of General Services, the director of the office may issue a requisition for a warrant to draw the amount as may be due, plus a penalty of ten percent (10%) of the amount, from any fund appropriated for the use of the agency which has failed to pay rental as agreed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 8952-03, 8952-04, 8952-05; Laws, 1972, ch. 326, §§ 4-6; Laws, 1973, ch. 476, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 560, § 10; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 10; Laws, 1993, ch. 311, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 4, 1993).

§ 29-5-7.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 24, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§29-5-7. [Codes, 1906, § 4658; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3931; 1930, § 4010; 1942, § 8953; Laws, 1904, ch. 109]

§ 29-5-9.
Employment of receptionist and elevator operator.

The director shall have the power and is hereby authorized to employ an elevator operator for the New Capitol Building.

The Senate Management Committee and the House Management Committee (or any successors having responsibility for the hiring of legislative employees), acting jointly, shall have the power, and are hereby authorized, to employ and compensate a receptionist for the New Capitol Building and any assistants deemed necessary for such receptionist. Compensation for the receptionist and any assistants shall be paid out of funds appropriated for joint legislative operations.

It shall be the duty of such receptionist to operate an information desk, furnish information to visitors; maintain a registration book for visitors; distribute literature furnished by state agencies, historical societies, pilgrimage clubs, private individuals or organizations engaged in the manufacturing of products from Mississippi resources; and conduct tours of the building. All agencies of the State of Mississippi and others having literature for distribution shall supply the New Capitol Building receptionist with copies of such literature for distribution.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8953.5; Laws, 1948, ch. 217, §§ 1-3; Laws, 1950, ch. 206 (¶ 1); Laws, 1952, ch. 333; Laws, 1960, ch. 339; Laws, 1966, ch. 445, § 3; Laws, 1966, ch. 545; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 11; Laws, 1997, ch. 358 § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 29-5-11.
Hours capitol open.

The Secretary of State shall have charge of the keys and other fastenings of all the exterior doors of the capitol and of all such rooms as are not occupied by one of the courts or as public offices authorized by law; and he shall keep in good order and securely locked, all rooms not actually occupied by the officers to whom they have been appropriated. He shall open the exterior doors at seven o’clock in the morning and keep the same open until the hours of six o’clock in the evening Monday through Friday; provided however, that the capitol shall be kept open when the legislature is in session until a reasonable hour after both houses have concluded the day’s business. The capitol shall likewise be kept open so as not to interfere with the sessions of the Supreme Court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 271; 1892, § 4102; 1906, § 4654; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7492; 1930, § 4005; 1942, § 8948; Laws, 1964, ch. 542, § 7, eff from and after 10 days after passage (approved June 11, 1964).

§ 29-5-12.
Landscaping and care of New Capitol grounds.

The state building commission is authorized and directed to provide for reasonable landscaping and care, including the installation of a water sprinkling system, for the New Capitol grounds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8952-07; Laws, 1972, ch. 326, § 8, eff thirty (30) days from and after passage (Enacted April 5, 1972, without approval of Governor).

§ 29-5-13.
Curator of the New Capitol Building; powers and duties of curator; transfer of position of Curator of the New Capitol Building from jurisdiction of Department of Archives and History to the House Management Committee and the Senate Rules Committee.

There is established the position of Curator of the New Capitol Building, who shall have the following powers and duties:

To oversee, initiate, approve and monitor the care of the New Capitol Building and grounds to ensure long-term preservation, conservation and maintenance of the building, historic furnishings and grounds;

To coordinate with personnel of the Department of Finance and Administration and the project professionals on any repair, renovation or restoration plans for the New Capitol Building or grounds, ensuring that all work is in accordance with the Secretary of the Interior’s Standards for Rehabilitation;

To request quotations for projects at the New Capitol Building or grounds upon instructions from the Department of Finance and Administration and from the House Management committee and the Senate Rules Committee acting jointly; apply for permits from the Department of Archives and History when applicable; request that projects be initiated through the proper agency and serve as the in-house professional depending upon the scope of work; maintain contact with any project professional involved in a project, beginning with the bid or quote process through initiation and completion of the project; and notify the House, the Senate, joint legislative operations or the Department of Finance and Administration, as appropriate, when the project is complete and ready for final payment;

To coordinate special state events and approved private events held at the New Capitol Building or grounds other than those held in the Chambers of the House of Representatives or the Senate;

To serve as a liaison to the Clerk of the House of Representatives, Secretary of the Senate, Department of Finance and Administration, Department of Archives and History and project professionals on all projects at the New Capitol Building or grounds;

To supervise visitor services personnel in providing tours and events for the public and members of the Legislature that are held at the New Capitol Building or grounds; and

To perform such other duties relating to the New Capitol Building or grounds as jointly prescribed by the House Management Committee and the Senate Rules Committee.

The Curator of the New Capitol Building shall be employed by and under the joint jurisdiction of the House Management Committee and the Senate Rules Committee, and the expenses of the curator shall be paid from the funds appropriated by the Legislature for the joint legislative operations of the House and the Senate. The curator shall provide quarterly reports to the House Management committee and the Senate Rules Committee on the activities and expenses of the curator during the preceding quarter.

The Curator of the New Capitol Building who is employed by the Board of Trustees of the Department of Archives and History under the provisions of Section 39-5-6 on the effective date of this act shall be transferred from the jurisdiction of the department to the joint jurisdiction of the House Management Committee and the Senate Rules Committee.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 335, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§§ 29-5-15 through 29-5-55.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1972, ch. 326, § 32, eff 30 days after passage (Enacted April 5, 1972, without approval of Governor).

§29-5-15. [Codes, 1942, § 8953.4-05; Laws, 1964, ch. 551, § 5]

§29-5-17. [Codes, 1942, §§ 8953.4, 8953.4-03; Laws, 1958, ch. 604; Laws, 1964, ch. 551, § 3]

§29-5-19. [Codes, 1942, §§ 8953.4-06, 8953.4-12; Laws, ch. 551, §§ 6, 12]

§29-5-21. [Codes, 1942, § 8953.4-07; Laws, 1964, ch. 551, § 7]

§29-5-23. [Codes, 1942, §§ 8953.3, 8953.4-02, 8953.4-12; Laws, 1955, Ex Sess ch. 124, §§ 1-3; Laws, 1964, ch. 551, §§ 2, 12]

§29-5-25. [Codes, 1942, §§ 8953.4-09, 8953.4-13; Laws, 1964, ch. 551, §§ 9, 13]

§29-5-27. [Codes, 1942, §§ 8953.4-07, 8953.4-08; Laws, 1964, ch. 551, §§ 7, 8]

§29-5-29. [Codes, 1942, §§ 8953.4, 8953.4-04, 8953.4-10; Laws, 1958, ch. 604; Laws, 1964, ch. 551, §§ 4, 10]

§29-5-31. [Codes, 1942, §§ 8953.3, 8953.4, 8953.4-11, 8953.4-14; Laws, 1955, Ex Sess ch. 124, §§ 1-3; 1958, ch. 604; Laws, 1964, ch. 551, §§ 11, 14]

§29-5-33. [Codes, 1942, §§ 8953.7-01, 8953.7-10; Laws, 1965, Ex Sess ch. 7, §§ 1, 10]

§29-5-35. [Codes, 1942, §§ 8953.7-02, 8953.7-21, 8953.7-41; Laws, 1965, Ex Sess, ch. 7, § 2; Laws, 1965, Ex Sess, ch. 8, § 1; Laws, 1965, Ex Sess, ch. 9, § 1]

§29-5-37. [Codes, 1942, §§ 8953.7-03, 8953.7-04, 8953.7-22, 8953.7-42; Laws, 1965, Ex Sess, ch. 7, §§ 3, 4; Laws, 1965, Ex Sess, ch. 8, § 2; Laws, 1965, Ex Sess,ch. 9, § 2 ]

§29-5-39. [Codes, 1942, §§ 8953.7-05, 8953.7-23, 8953.7-43; Laws, 1965, Ex Sess, ch. 7, § 5; Laws, 1965, Ex Sess, ch. 8, § 3; Laws, 1965, Ex Sess, ch. 9, § 3]

§29-5-41. [Codes, 1942, §§ 8953.7-06, 8953.7-24, 8953.7-44; Laws, 1965, Ex Sess, ch. 7, § 6; Laws, 1965, Ex Sess, ch. 8, § 4; Laws, 1965, Ex Sess,ch. 9, § 4]

§29-5-43. [Codes, 1942, §§ 8953.7-07, 8953.7-25, 8953.7-45; Laws, 1965, Ex Sess, ch. 7, § 7; Laws, 1965, Ex Sess, ch. 8, § 5; Laws, 1965, Ex Sess, ch. 9, § 5]

§29-5-45. [Codes, 1942, §§ 8953.7-08, 8953.7-26, 8953.7-46; Laws, 1965, Ex Sess, ch. 7, § 8; Laws, 1965, Ex Sess, ch. 8, § 6; Laws, 1965, Ex Sess,ch. 9, § 6]

§29-5-47. [Codes, 1942, §§ 8953.7-09, 8953.7-27, 8953.7-47; Laws, 1965, Ex Sess, ch. 7, § 9; Laws, 1965, Ex Sess, ch. 8, § 7; Laws, 1965, Ex Sess, ch. 9, § 7]

§29-5-49. [Codes, 1942, §§ 8953.7-11, 8953.7-12, 8953.7-28, 8953.7-48; Laws, 1965, Ex Sess, ch. 7, §§ 11, 12; Laws, 1965, Ex Sess, ch. 8, § 8; Laws, 1965, Ex Sess, ch. 9, § 8]

§29-5-51. [Codes, 1942, §§ 8953.7-13, 8953.7-50; Laws, 1965, Ex Sess, ch. 7, § 13; Laws, 1965, Ex Sess, ch. 9, § 10]

§29-5-53. [Codes, 1942, §§ 8953.7-29, 8953.7-49; Laws, 1965, Ex Sess, ch. 8, § 9; Laws, 1965, Ex Sess, ch. 9, § 9]

§29-5-55. [Codes, 1942, §§ 8953.7-14, 8953.7-30, 8953.7-51; Laws, 1965, Ex Sess, ch. 7, § 14; Laws, 1965, Ex Sess, ch. 8, § 10; Laws, 1965, Ex Sess, ch. 9, § 11]

§ 29-5-57.
Regulation of parking.

It shall be the duty of the Office of General Services to supervise and regulate the parking of motor vehicles at the facilities named in Section 29-5-2 except for the state board of health building and the governor’s mansion, and to make all necessary regulations therefor to the end that parking space shall be available for state officers and employees whose official duties require their presence therein, and for business visitors, authorized members of the press, tourists and other visitors who are in need of parking space at any such building, subject, however, to the special provisions of Section 29-5-65 which apply when the legislature is in session.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8952-08; Laws, 1972, ch. 326, § 9; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 29-5-59.
Parking for Governor.

A suitable parking space or spaces adjacent to the south side of the New Capitol Building between the south entrance to the first floor and the east walkway, or President Street entrance, shall be reserved for use of the Governor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8952-10; Laws, 1972, ch. 326, § 11, eff 30 days after passage (Enacted April 5, 1972, without approval of Governor).

§ 29-5-61.
Parking adjacent to north side of New Capitol Building.

The Office of General Services is authorized and directed to have designated not less than twenty (20) parking spaces adjacent to the north side of the New Capitol Building for the use of tourists, visitors and those having temporary business to transact in the New Capitol. All parking spaces adjacent to the north side of the New Capitol Building shall be and are hereby reserved for use by the lieutenant governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president pro tempore of the senate, officers of the senate and house of representatives, and visitors, tourists and those persons having temporary business to transact in the New Capitol Building. The said parking spaces shall be plainly marked with suitable signs or markers, designating which space is reserved for such individual or officer. The spaces reserved for use in parking for visitors, tourists and those having temporary business to transact in said New Capitol Building shall be plainly marked with suitable signs or markers showing that they are reserved for visitors and with the notation thereon “two-hour limit.” The Office of General Services shall provide suitable signs and markers to indicate those parking spaces which shall be available for the convenience of tourists, visitors, and those having temporary business to transact in the New Capitol.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 8952-07, 8952-09; Laws, 1972, ch. 326, §§ 8, 10; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 29-5-63.
Parking for state officers, employees, and press.

All parking spaces on the north side of the New Capitol Building, other than those adjacent to the north side of said building, between the north, or High Street entrance, and the east walkway, or President Street entrance, shall be and are hereby reserved for use of state officers, state employees and authorized members of the press whose official duties require their presence in the New Capitol Building.

Parking spaces not otherwise specifically designated may be made available to other state officers and employees not domiciled in the New Capitol Building, in the discretion of the Office of General Services and under such regulations as may be prescribed therefor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 8952-11, 8952-12; Laws, 1972, ch. 326, §§ 12, 13; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 29-5-65.
Parking for members of Legislature.

At any time when the Legislature is in session, the Office of General Services shall designate and reserve sufficient parking spaces around the New Capitol Building to accommodate the members of the Legislature, and, when such spaces have been so designated and reserved, they shall be identified and marked by means of numbers, one (1) of which shall be assigned to each member of the Legislature, and that space for which he or she holds that number shall be reserved for the exclusive use of the said legislator. The Office of General Services is authorized and directed to reserve and allocate, among those spaces, an individual parking space for use of any member of the Legislature who is physically handicapped, so as to make his or her entrance to and exit from the New Capitol Building as convenient as is reasonably possible.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8952-13; Laws, 1972, ch. 326, § 14; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 29-5-67.
Insignia for automobiles.

The Office of General Services is directed to have prepared or to secure suitable insignia for placing on automobiles so as to properly designate said automobiles as belonging to or used by state officers and employees and denoting thereon whether such officer or employee is located in the New Capitol Building or such other identification as will aid in the enforcement of Sections 29-5-57 through 29-5-67 and section 29-5-77. Such insignia or other identification shall be issued once each year to all state officers or state employees entitled thereto.

Members of the state legislature shall be furnished with distinctive insignia of appropriate design for their personal automobiles, the expense to be paid out of the contingent fund of each house.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8952-14; Laws, 1972, ch. 326, § 15; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 29-5-69.
Parking for capitol employees during legislative sessions.

During the period each year when the legislature is in session, all parking spaces adjacent to the capitol grounds on the west side of President Street and on both sides of High Street shall be reserved for the use of capitol employees. The office of general services is instructed to place signs to that effect on said streets during legislative sessions.

All employees in the capitol who own automobiles shall be provided with distinctive stickers. Each such employee shall place the sticker in a prominent place on the rear of the automobile owned and regularly used by such employee.

Any person without a sticker on his automobile who parks in any space reserved in the first paragraph of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction, be fined not to exceed Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00).

Any person who is not a capitol employee who has on his automobile a capitol parking sticker or any capitol employee who gives his parking sticker to a non-capitol employee to use on such person’s car, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction, be fined One Hundred Dollars ($100.00).

The capitol police employed by the office of general services shall have the authority and are directed to enforce the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8953.45; Laws, 1972, ch. 434, §§ 1, 2, 3, 4; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 29-5-71.
Signs to indicate reserved parking spaces.

The Office of General Services is hereby directed to erect suitable signs or markers to indicate the parking spaces reserved, in conformity with Sections 29-5-57 through 29-5-67 and Sections 29-5-71 through 29-5-77.

The state highway department is hereby directed to cooperate with the Office of General Services in the painting or marking of such parking spaces as are prescribed by the Office of General Services.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 8952-15, 8952-16; Laws, 1972, ch. 326, §§ 16, 17; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 29-5-73.
Parking restrictions.

The driveway on the north side of the New Capitol Building leading from High Street to the north entrance to said building shall not be used for parking.

When the legislature is not in session, no person other than elected state officials and state employees whose official duties require their presence in the New Capitol Building, visitors, tourists, members of the press and those having temporary business to transact in the New Capitol Building, as referred to in Section 29-5-61, shall have the right to park on the New Capitol Building grounds, except as provided in Section 29-5-63.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 8952-13, 8952-17; Laws, 1972, ch. 326, §§ 14, 18, eff 30 days after passage (Enacted April 5, 1972, without approval of Governor).

§ 29-5-75.
Penalty for illegal parking.

Any person, other than an out-of-state tourist, who shall knowingly allow his automobile or vehicle to remain parked for a longer period than two (2) hours in any of the parking spaces adjacent to the north side of the New Capitol which are reserved for tourists, visitors, and persons having temporary business therein, and any person parking, or causing to be parked, his or any motor vehicle or other conveyance in or on the grounds of the facilities named in Section 29-5-2 in other violation of Sections 29-5-57 through 29-5-67 and Sections 29-5-71 through 29-5-77, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction therefor, shall be fined not exceeding ten dollars ($10.00) for each offense.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 8952-25, 8952-26; Laws, 1972, ch. 326, §§ 26, 27, eff 30 days after passage (Enacted April 5, 1972, without approval of Governor).

§ 29-5-77.
Jurisdiction to enforce laws on state grounds.

The Department of Finance and Administration shall have jurisdiction relative to the enforcement of all laws of the State of Mississippi on the properties, from curb to curb including adjoining streets, sidewalks and leased parking lots within the Capitol complex, set forth in Section 29-5-2, the Court of Appeals Building, the Mississippi Department of Transportation Building and the Public Employees’ Retirement System Building, and any property purchased, constructed or otherwise acquired by the State of Mississippi for conducting state business and not specifically under the supervision and care by any other state entity, but which is reasonably assumed the department would be responsible for such, as approved by the Public Procurement Review Board. The Department of Finance and Administration shall, through any person or persons appointed by the Department of Finance and Administration, or through the Department of Public Safety when requested by the Department of Finance and Administration, make arrests for any violation of any law of the State of Mississippi on those grounds of or within those properties. The Department of Finance and Administration shall enforce the provisions of Sections 29-5-57 through 29-5-67, 29-5-71 through 29-5-77, and 29-5-81 through 29-5-95, and prescribe such rules and regulations as are necessary therefor.

When in the opinion of the Governor or, in his absence, the Lieutenant Governor, it is readily apparent that an emergency exists that the persons appointed by the Department of Finance and Administration are unable to control in the accomplishment of the provisions of Sections 29-5-57 through 29-5-67, 29-5-71 through 29-5-77, and 29-5-81 through 29-5-95 in regard to law enforcement, then the Governor or, in his absence, the Lieutenant Governor, may call upon the Department of Public Safety, members of which shall have power to arrest and detain any persons violating the provisions of those sections of law, until the person can be brought before the proper authorities for trial.

Subject to the approval of the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, the Board of Trustees and the Department of Finance and Administration shall be authorized to enter into a contract for the Department of Finance and Administration to supply the security personnel with jurisdiction to enforce all laws of the State of Mississippi on the property of the Board of Trustees located at the corner of Ridgewood Road and Lakeland Drive in the City of Jackson.

The Department of Finance and Administration and the Department of Agriculture are authorized to enter into a contract for the Department of Finance and Administration to have jurisdiction and enforce all laws of the State of Mississippi on the property of the Department of Agriculture located at 121 North Jefferson Street and the new Farmer’s Market Building located at the corner of High and Jefferson Streets in the City of Jackson, Hinds County, Mississippi. It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of Finance and Administration will not post any security personnel at such buildings, but will provide regular vehicle patrols and responses to security system alarms.

The Department of Finance and Administration and the Mississippi Fair Commission are authorized to enter into a contract for the Department of Finance and Administration to have jurisdiction and enforce all laws of the State of Mississippi on the property of the Mississippi Fair Commission known as the “Mississippi State Fairgrounds Complex” and any and all of its outlying buildings and property. The Department of Finance and Administration and the Mississippi Fair Commission are authorized to enter into a contract for the Department of Finance and Administration to supply the security personnel to the Mississippi Fair Commission with jurisdiction to enforce all laws of the State of Mississippi on this property and any and all buildings on this property.

The Department of Finance and Administration and the Department of Revenue are authorized to enter into a contract for the Department of Finance and Administration to supply the security personnel with jurisdiction to enforce all laws of the State of Mississippi at the Alcoholic Beverage Control facility and the Department of Revenue main office.

The Department of Finance and Administration shall have jurisdiction relative to the enforcement of all laws of the State of Mississippi within the boundaries of the Capitol Complex Improvement District created in Section 29-5-203. The Department of Finance and Administration shall, through any person or persons appointed by the Department of Finance and Administration, make arrests for any violation of any law of the State of Mississippi which occurs within the boundaries of the district. The jurisdiction of the Department of Finance and Administration under this subsection (6) shall be concurrent with the jurisdiction of the City of Jackson, Mississippi, and that of Hinds County, Mississippi. The jurisdiction and authority of the Department of Finance and Administration under this subsection (6) shall be in addition to any other jurisdiction and authority provided to the department under this section or any other law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 8952-28, 8952-29; Laws, 1972, ch. 326, §§ 29, 30; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 19; Laws, 1996, ch. 398, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 367, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 504, § 4; Laws, 2006, ch. 364, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 430, § 2; Laws, 2008, ch. 466, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 357, § 3; Laws, 2017, ch. 444, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 29-5-79.
Protection of State Capitol Building.

The speaker of the House of Representatives and the Lieutenant Governor are authorized to make such regulations as they may deem necessary for preserving the peace and securing the State Capitol from defacement, and for the protection of the property therein. The Lieutenant Governor or the speaker of the House of Representatives may request the assistance of the office of general services and the State Department of Public Safety in order to preserve the peace at the State Capitol and secure the State Capitol from defacement, and for the protection of the property therein.

All regulations promulgated under authority of this section shall be filed with the Secretary of State and be made available for public inspection; such regulation shall likewise be published in one (1) of the daily newspapers of the City of Jackson, and shall not become effective until the expiration of ten (10) days after the date of such filing with the Secretary of State and such publication.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8952-41; Laws, 1972, ch. 458, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 29-5-81.
Description of state grounds.

Grounds of public buildings over which the Department of Finance and Administration has jurisdiction shall comprise the following:

In the City of Jackson, Mississippi:

The grounds surrounding all state buildings identified in Section 29-5-2(a)(i) and all seat of government property;

State Board of Health Complex: Bounded on the north by Stadium Drive, on the west by the property of Mississippi Hospital and Medical Service, on the south by Woodrow Wilson Avenue, on the southeast by property leased by the Mississippi Federation of Women’s Clubs and on the east by North State Street;

The Barefield Property, the Sun-n-Sand Property and any other property described in Section 1 of Chapter 542, Laws of 2009;

The Mississippi State Fairgrounds Complex, including, but not limited to, the Mississippi Coliseum, Trademart, Kirk Fordice Equine Center, Mississippi Street Armory, and all arenas, barns, buildings, campgrounds and property whatsoever; such property being bounded on the north by High Street, on the west by Jefferson Street, on the east by Greymont Street, and on the south by Greymont Street.

The grounds of Dr. Eldon Langston Bolton Building: Located in the City of Biloxi, Mississippi.

The grounds of State Service Center: Located at the intersection of U.S. Highway 49 and John Merl Tatum Industrial Drive in the City of Hattiesburg, Mississippi.

Any grounds of any property purchased, constructed or otherwise acquired by the State of Mississippi for conducting state business and not specifically under the supervision and care by any other state entity, but which is reasonably assumed the department would be responsible for such, as approved by the Public Procurement Review Board, including, but not limited to:

1. The grounds of the National Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA) Shared Services Center and Lockheed Martin Building at Stennis Space Center;

2. The grounds of the Mississippi Sports Hall of Fame;

3. The grounds of the Mississippi Crafts Center;

4. The grounds of the Mississippi Children’s Museum; and

5. The grounds of the Mississippi Arts and Entertainment Center.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8952-06; Laws, 1972, ch. 326, § 7; Laws, 1980, ch. 375, § 3; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 21; Laws, 1996, ch. 398, § 2; Laws, 1998, ch. 424, § 2; Laws, 2001, ch. 325, § 2; Laws, 2004, ch. 301, § 4; Laws, 2008, ch. 430, § 3; Laws, 2009, ch. 542, § 3; Laws, 2013, ch. 357, § 4; Laws, 2017, ch. 330, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 13, 2017).

§ 29-5-83.
Restrictions on travel and occupancy of grounds.

Public travel in and occupancy of the grounds under the authority of the Office of General Services described in Section 29-5-81 shall be restricted to the roads, walks and places prepared for that purpose by paving or otherwise. It is forbidden to occupy the roads, walks or places in such grounds in such manner as to obstruct or hinder their proper use.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 8952-18, 8952-19; Laws, 1972, ch. 326, §§ 19, 20; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 29-5-85.
Prohibition of sales, signs, placards, and solicitations.

It is forbidden to offer or expose any article for sale in or on such grounds; to display any sign, placard, or other form of advertisement therein; or to solicit fares, alms, subscriptions, or contributions therein.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8952-20; Laws, 1972, ch. 326, § 21, eff 30 days after passage (Enacted April 5, 1972, without approval of Governor).

§ 29-5-87.
Injuries to structures or vegetation.

It is forbidden to step or climb upon, remove, or in any way injure any statue, seat, wall, fountain, or other erection or architectural feature, or any tree, shrub, plant, or turf in such grounds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8952-21; Laws, 1972, ch. 326, § 22, eff 30 days after passage (Enacted April 5, 1972, without approval of Governor).

§ 29-5-89.
Discharge of firearms or explosives, setting fires, uttering threatening or abusive language.

It is forbidden to discharge any firearm, firework or explosive, set fire to any combustible, make any harangue or oration, or utter loud, threatening, or abusive language in such grounds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8952-22; Laws, 1972, ch. 326, § 23, eff 30 days after passage (Enacted April 5, 1972, without approval of Governor).

§ 29-5-91.
Parades and assemblages, display of banners.

It is forbidden to parade, stand, or move in processions or assemblages in such grounds, or to display therein any flag, banner, or device designed or adapted to bring into public notice any party, organization, or movement, except as hereinafter provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8952-23; Laws, 1972, ch. 326, § 24, eff 30 days after passage (Enacted April 5, 1972, without approval of Governor).